Vermont, session 2025-2026, H38.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION; POSITIONS; APPROPRIATION
(a) The following new positions are created in the Human Rights
Commission:
(1) one full-time, permanent, classified Communications and Outreach
Coordinator;
VT LEG #379115 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.38
2025 Page 2 of 2
(2) one full-time, permanent, classified Intake Specialist;
(3) three full-time, permanent, exempt Staff Attorney Investigators;
(4) one full-time, permanent, exempt Paralegal;
(5) one part-time, permanent, classified Mediator; and
(6) one part-time, permanent, classified Social Worker/Case Manager.
(b) In fiscal year 2026, the following amounts are appropriated from the
General Fund to the Human Rights Commission:
(1) $25,000.00 for education and outreach activities; and
(2) for the positions created in subsection (a) of this section:
(A) $794,616.00 for salary and benefits;
(B) $18,000.00 for related operating expenses and equipment; and
(C) $50,000.00 for additional office space.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379115 v.2